Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5571.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 4k. Section 4j does not apply if the department incorporates by reference the International Code Councilâs publication of single interior exit stairway for a multiple-family dwelling that is 4 or more levels above grade plane into the code. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5570 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor